North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 4. Organization and System for Delivery of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.
§ 122C-102.
State Plan for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services; system performance measures.

Purpose of State Plan. — The Department shall develop and implement a State Plan for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services. The purpose of the State Plan is to provide a strategic template regarding how State and local resources shall be organized and used to provide services. The State Plan shall be issued every three years beginning July 1, 2007. It shall identify specific goals to be achieved by the Department, area authorities, and county programs over a three-year period of time and benchmarks for determining whether progress is being made towards those goals. It shall also identify data that will be used to measure progress towards the specified goals. In order to increase the ability of the State, area authorities, county programs, private providers, and consumers to successfully implement the goals of the State Plan, the Department shall not adopt or implement policies that are inconsistent with the State Plan without first consulting with the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.

Content of State Plan. — The State Plan shall include the following:

Vision and mission of the State Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services system.

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-142, s. 2(a), effective July 19, 2006.

Protection of client rights and consumer involvement in planning and management of system services.

Provision of services to targeted populations, including criteria for identifying targeted populations.

Compliance with federal mandates in establishing service priorities in mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse.

Description of the core services that are available to all individuals in order to improve consumer access to mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services at the local level.

Service standards for the mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services system.

Implementation of the uniform portal process.

Strategies and schedules for implementing the service plan, including consultation on Medicaid policy with area and county programs, qualified providers, and others as designated by the Secretary, intersystem collaboration, promotion of best practices, technical assistance, outcome-based monitoring, and evaluation.

A plan for coordination of the State Plan for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services with the Medicaid State Plan, and NC Health Choice.

A business plan to demonstrate efficient and effective resource management of the mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services system, including strategies for accountability for non-Medicaid and Medicaid services.

Strategies and schedules for implementing a phased in plan to eliminate disparities in the allocation of State funding across county programs and area authorities by January 1, 2007, including methods to identify service gaps and to ensure equitable use of State funds to fill those gaps among all counties.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12A.8(c), effective July 1, 2013.

History.

2001-437, s. 1.5; 2006-142, s. 2(a); 2011-291, s. 2.42; 2013-360, s. 12A.8(c).

Adult Care Home Model for Community-Based Services.

Session Laws 2001-424, s. 21.54(a) and (b) contained similar provisions.

Session Laws 2001-424, s. 21.58(b), provides: “The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall develop a plan, after consultation with advocacy groups and affected State and local agencies and programs concerned with the mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services needs of the State, for the use of funds from the Trust Fund for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services and Bridge Funding Needs established under G.S. 143D-15D to meet the mental health needs of the State. The plan shall be consistent with the plan developed pursuant to

G.S. 122C-102

, if enacted in House Bill 381 of the 2001 General Assembly. Funds shall not be transferred from the Trust Fund for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services and Bridge Funding Needs until the Secretary has consulted with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and the Chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services and the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services.”

Session Laws 2001-424, ss. 21.62 (a) to (d), provide: “(a) In keeping with the United States Supreme Court Decision in Olmstead vs. L.C. & E.W. and State policy to provide appropriate services to clients in the least restrictive and most appropriate environment, the Department of Health and Human Services shall develop and implement a plan for the transfer of residents of State mental retardation centers, if appropriate, as follows:

“(1)
Transfer those residents of the centers that need institutional services to a private intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded.

“(2)
Transition to community programs and services those residents of the center that may be appropriately served in the community.

“The Department shall develop a transition plan for moving each resident of the mental retardation center to the community-based services and supports, if appropriate.
The transition plan shall be developed in consultation with the resident and the resident’s family or guardian.

“(b) The Department may use funds from the Trust Fund for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services and Bridge Funding Needs to facilitate the transition of residents into alternative community-based services as required under subsection (a) of this section [s. 21.62 (a) of Session Laws 2001-424].
Nonrecurring savings realized from implementation of the plan required under subsection (a) of this section [s. 21.62 (a) of Session Laws 2001-424] shall be deposited to the Trust Fund for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services and Bridge Funding Needs to be used to facilitate the transition of clients into appropriate community-based services and supports in accordance with Section 21.58 of this ac [Session Laws 2001-424]. Recurring savings realized through implementation of this section [s. 21.62 of Session Laws 2001-424] shall be retained by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services (i) for implementation of subsection (a)(1) and (2) of this section [ss. 21.62 (a) (1) and (a) (2) of Session Laws 2001-424], and (ii) to support the recurring costs of additional community-based placements from Division facilities in accordance with Olmstead vs. L.C. & E.W.

“(c) On or before January 1, 2002, and again on or before May 1, 2002, and May 1, 2003, the Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on its progress in implementing this section [s. 21.62 of Session Laws 2001-424].

“(d) Before closing one or more State mental retardation centers the Department shall report the closure to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.”

Session Laws 2003-284, ss. 10.15(a) through (c), provide: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop and implement a plan for the reorganization of outreach services performed by the State mental retardation centers. The plan shall provide for the elimination of self-referrals by the mental retardation centers and shall include the following:

“(1) The area and county mental health programs shall have exclusive authority for referring to the mental retardation centers persons in the community who are in need of specialized services.

“(2) The mental retardation centers shall coordinate the transition of residents from the mental retardation centers to area and county mental health programs, and shall provide technical assistance to community service providers and families who care for transitioned residents, and to others in the community, as appropriate, for the purpose of furthering community services and placement.

“(3) The method for allocating savings in State appropriations from the mental retardation centers across the area and county mental health programs.

“(b) In accordance with the plan established in subsection (a) of this section, any recurring and nonrecurring savings in State appropriations that result from the transfer of referral activities in the mental retardation centers to area and county mental health programs shall be transferred from the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services to area and county mental health programs for referral activities.

“(c) The Department of Health and Human Services shall report on the implementation of this section to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division. This report shall be submitted on February 1, 2004.”

Session Laws 2003-284, ss. 10.12(a) through (d), effective July 1, 2003, provide: “(a) In keeping with the United States Supreme Court decision in Olmstead vs. L.C. & E.W. and State policy to provide appropriate services to clients in the least restrictive and most appropriate environment, the Department of Health and Human Services shall develop and implement a plan for the construction of a replacement facility for Dorothea Dix Hospital and for the transition of patients to the community or to other long-term care facilities, as appropriate. The goal is to develop mechanisms and identify resources needed to enable patients and their families to receive the necessary services and supports based on the following guiding principles:

“(1) Individuals shall be provided acute psychiatric care in non-State facilities when appropriate.

“(2) Individuals shall be provided acute psychiatric care in State facilities only when non-State facilities are unavailable.

“(3) Individuals shall receive evidenced-based psychiatric services and care that are cost-efficient.

“(4) The State shall minimize cost shifting to other State and local facilities or institutions.

“(b) The Department of Health and Human Services shall conduct an analysis of the individual patient service needs and shall develop and implement an individual transition plan, as appropriate, for patients in each hospital. The State shall ensure that each individual transition plan, as appropriate, shall take into consideration the availability of appropriate alternative placements based on the needs of the patient and within resources available for the mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services system. In developing each plan, the Department shall consult with the patient and the patient’s family or other legal representative.

“(c) In accordance with the plan established in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, any nonrecurring savings in State appropriations that result from reductions in beds or services shall be placed in the Trust Fund for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services and Bridge Funding Needs. These funds shall be used to facilitate the transition of clients into appropriate community-based services and supports in accordance with G.S. 143-15.3D. Recurring savings realized through implementation of this section shall be retained by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, (i) for implementation of subsections (a) and (b) of this section and (ii) to support the recurring costs of additional community-based placements from Division facilities in accordance with Olmstead vs. L.C. & E.W.

“(d) The Department of Health and Human Services shall submit reports on the status of implementation of this section to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division. These reports shall be submitted on December 1, 2003, and May 1, 2004.”

For similar prior provisions see S.L. 2001-424, ss. 21.63(a) to (e).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 10.12, provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of State Operated Facilities, shall issue a Request for Proposal for the consolidation of forensic hospital care. The operation shall initially be located at the Dorothea Dix complex. The Secretary of Health and Human Services is authorized to proceed with contracting with a private entity if the Secretary can justify savings through the contract. The Secretary shall compare the Department’s total cost to provide forensic care to proposals received and determine whether it is cost-effective to contract for this service. The Secretary may only proceed if the Secretary determines the Department will save money and ensure appropriate safety and quality of care for patients.

“The Secretary shall report to the Joint Appropriations Subcommittee for Health and Human Services by October 30, 2011, with cost detail and savings identified from the proposals.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 10.13(a), provides: “Effective July 1, 2000, the county share of the cost of Medicaid services currently and previously provided by area mental health authorities shall be increased incrementally each fiscal year until the county share reaches fifteen percent (15%) of the nonfederal share by State fiscal year 2009-2010.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 10.13(b), provides: “Effective July 1, 2000, the county share of the cost of Medicaid Personal Care Services paid to adult care homes shall be decreased incrementally each fiscal year until the county share reaches fifteen percent (15%) of the nonfederal share by State fiscal year 2009-2010.”

For similar prior provisions see Session Laws 2003-284, §§ 10.22(a) and (b).

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 10.24(a)-(c), provides: “The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall, in consultation with interested advocacy groups and affected State and local agencies, develop a long-range plan for addressing the mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services needs of the State. The plan shall be consistent with the plan developed pursuant to

G.S. 122C-102

and shall address the following:

“(1) The service needed at the community level within each LME in order to ensure an adequate level of services to the average number of persons needing the services based on population projections.‘

“(2) The full continuum of services needed for each disability group within an LME, including:

“a. Which services could be regional or multi-LME based;

“b. What percent of the population each LME would expect to use State-level facilities; and

“c. An inventory of existing services within each LME for each disability group, and the gaps that exist;

“(3) Projected growth in services for each disability group within each LME or region that can reasonably be managed over the ensuing five-year period; and

“(4) Projected start-up costs and the total funding needed in each year from the Trust Fund for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services and Bridge Funding Needs to implement the long-range plan.

“Funds shall not be transferred from the Trust Fund for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services and Bridge Funding Needs until the Secretary has consulted with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and the Chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services and the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services.

“(b) The Department shall use not less than fifty percent (50%) of moneys in the Trust Fund established pursuant to G.S. 143-15D for the 2005-2006 fiscal year for nonrecurring start-up funds for community-based services, including funding for existing area program services to transition to the private sector or to another public service agency. Moneys in the Trust Fund may be used to expand recurring community-based services only if sufficient recurring funds can be identified within the Department from funds currently budgeted for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services, area mental health programs or county programs, or local government.

“(c) Not later than March 1, 2006, the Department of Health and Human Services shall report on the implementation of this section to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division.”

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 10.49(u), provides: “In keeping with the United States Supreme Court decision in
Olmstead v. L.C. & E.W.
and State policy to provide appropriate services to clients in the least restrictive and most appropriate environment, the Department of Health and Human Services shall continue to implement a plan for the transition of patients from State psychiatric hospitals to the community or to other long-term care facilities, as appropriate. The goal is to develop mechanisms and identify resources needed to enable patients and their families to receive the necessary services and supports based on the following guiding principles:

“(1) Individuals shall be provided acute psychiatric care in non-State facilities when appropriate.

“(2) Individuals shall be provided acute psychiatric care in State facilities only when non-State facilities are unavailable.

“(3) Individuals shall receive evidence-based psychiatric services and care that are cost-efficient.

“(4) The State shall minimize cost shifting to other State and local facilities or institutions.

“The Department of Health and Human Services shall conduct an analysis of the individual patient service needs and shall develop and implement an individual transition plan, as appropriate, for patients in each hospital. The State shall ensure that each individual transition plan, as appropriate, shall take into consideration the availability of appropriate alternative placements based on the needs of the patient and within resources available for the mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services system. In developing each plan, the Department shall consult with the patient and the patient’s family or other legal representative.

“The Department of Health and Human Services shall submit reports on the status of implementation of this section to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and the Fiscal Research Division. These reports shall be submitted on December 1, 2007, and May 1, 2008.”

For similar prior provisions see S.L. 2005-276, ss. 10.28(a) to (d).

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 10.29(a), provides: “In accordance with the Department of Health and Human Services’ plan for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services system reform, the Department shall ensure that the downsizing of the State’s regional mental retardation facilities is continuously based upon residents’ needs and the availability of community-based services with a targeted goal of four percent (4%) each year. The Department shall implement cost-containment and reduction strategies to ensure the corresponding financial and staff downsizing of each facility. The Department shall manage the client population of the mental retardation centers in order to ensure that placements for ICF-MR level of care shall be made in non-State facilities. Admissions to State ICF-MR facilities are permitted only as a last resort and only upon approval of the Department. The corresponding budgets for each of the State mental retardation centers shall be reduced, and positions shall be eliminated as the census of each facility decreases. At no time shall mental retardation center positions be transferred to other units within a facility or assigned nondirect care activities such as outreach.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 10.29(b), provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services shall apply any savings in State appropriations in each year of the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium that result from reductions in beds or services as follows:

“(1) The Department shall place nonrecurring savings in the Trust Fund for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services and Bridge Funding Needs and use the savings to facilitate the transition of clients into appropriate community-based services and support in accordance with G.S. 143-15.3D;

“(2) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, shall retain recurring savings realized through implementation of this section to support the recurring costs of additional community-based placements from Division facilities in accordance with Olmstead vs. L.C. & E.W. In determining the savings in this section, savings shall include all savings realized from the downsizing of the State mental retardation centers, including the savings in direct State appropriations in the budgets of the State mental retardation centers; and

“(3) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall transfer any recurring Medicaid savings resulting from the downsizing of State-operated MR centers from the ICF-MR line in Medicaid to the CAP-MR/DD line.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 10.29(c), provides: “Consistent with the requirements of this section, the Secretary of Health and Human Services shall develop a plan to ensure that there are sufficient developmental disability/mental retardation regional centers to correspond with service catchment areas. The Plan shall address:

“(1) Methods of funding for community services necessitated by down-sizing;

“(2) How many State-operated beds and non-State operated beds are needed to serve the population; and

“(3) Alternative uses for facilities.

“Not later than April 1, 2006, the Department shall report on the development of the plan, and not later than April 1, 2007, shall report the final plan, including recommendations for legislative action, to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 10.29(d), provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services shall report on its progress in complying with this section to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division. The Department shall submit the progress report no later than January 15, 2006, and submit a final report no later than May 1, 2006.”

For prior provisions, see Session Laws 2003-284, ss 10.14(a)-(d).

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 12F.1, as amended by Session Laws 2017-212, s. 3.1, provides: “(a) Definitions. — As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

“(1) Department. — The North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services.

“(2) FQHC. — A federally qualified health center located in this State.

“(3) Prescriber. — Anyone authorized to prescribe drugs pursuant to the laws of this State.

“(4) Program participant. — An individual who (i) has been clinically assessed and diagnosed with opioid addiction, (ii) is selected by an FQHC to participate in the pilot program authorized by this section, and (iii) as part of the pilot program, receives the nonnarcotic, nonaddictive, extended-release, injectable formulation of opioid antagonist approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the prevention of relapse to opioid dependence.

“(b) Pilot Program. — The Department shall oversee the administration of a three-year pilot program to be conducted by designated FQHCs to address North Carolina’s growing opioid addiction and overdose crisis. The goal of the pilot program is to study the effectiveness of combining behavioral therapy with the utilization of a nonnarcotic, nonaddictive, extended-release, injectable formulation of opioid antagonist approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the prevention of relapse to opioid dependence. In conducting the pilot program, selected FQHCs may collaborate with the Department, the North Carolina Institute of Medicine (NCIOM), and any other qualified entity or State agency that may be of assistance in accomplishing the objectives of the pilot program. Prior to the initiation of this pilot program, the Department shall, in collaboration with the NCIOM or any other qualified entity, determine the number of program participants needed to participate in the pilot program in order to ensure sufficient statistical significance to support any conclusions about the effectiveness of the pilot program.

“(c) Selection of Participating FQHCs. — Not later than 30 days after the effective date of this section, the Department shall select a minimum of three and not more than five FQHCs located in different areas of the State to participate in the pilot program authorized by this section, giving first priority to FQHCs that have received supplemental grant funds from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Health Resources and Services Administration, for substance abuse service expansion with a focus on medication-assisted treatment in opioid use disorders.

“(d) Selection of Program Participants. — Not later than 60 days after the effective date of this section, the Department shall develop, in collaboration with the NCIOM or any other qualified entity, a methodology for selecting program participants at each FQHC. Only individuals who have been clinically assessed and diagnosed with opioid addiction may be selected and treated as program participants. Individuals who have been referred from local criminal justice agencies may be selected as program participants.

“(e) Treatment Standards. — As a condition of participating in the pilot program authorized by this section, each FQHC shall sign a written participation agreement provided by the Department that requires the FQHC to adhere to at least all of the following treatment standards for the duration of its participation in the pilot program:

“(1) Treatment may be provided to program participants only by a treatment provider who is affiliated with a participating FQHC.

“(2) Only individuals who have been clinically assessed and diagnosed with opioid addiction may be selected and treated as program participants.

“(3) Treatment providers at participating FQHCs shall do all of the following:

“a. Provide treatment based on an integrated service delivery model that consists of the coordination of care between a prescriber and an addiction services provider.

“b. Conduct any necessary additional professional, comprehensive substance use disorder and mental health diagnostic assessments of individuals under consideration for selection as pilot program participants to determine if they would benefit from substance use disorder treatment and monitoring.

“c. Determine, based on the assessments described in sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision, the treatment needs of the program participants served by the treatment provider.

“d. Develop individualized treatment goals and objectives for each program participant.

“e. Provide program participants with access to medication-assisted treatment utilizing a nonnarcotic, nonaddictive, extended-release, injectable formulation of opioid antagonist.

“f. In addition to medication-assisted treatment, provide program participants with other types of therapies, including behavioral therapies, outpatient programs, and community support, for opioid use disorder and any other disorders that are determined by the treatment provider to be co-occurring disorders.

“g. In the case of medication-assisted treatment provided under the pilot program, a drug may be used only if it has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for use in combination with behavioral therapy for the prevention of relapse to opioid dependence.

“h. Comply with all applicable federal opioid treatment standards.

“i.Monitor the progress of program participants through the use of regular drug testing, including urinalysis..

“(f) FQHC Reports. — No later than 60 days after the effective date of this section, the Department shall, in collaboration with the NCIOM or any other qualified entity, develop a standardized methodology for the collection of information on program participants at each FQHC. As a condition of participating in the pilot program authorized by this section, each selected FQHC must agree to follow this standardized methodology for (i) collecting information on program participants and (ii) annually reporting that information to the Department, in the format prescribed by the Department. The annual report shall include at least all of the following information, in the format prescribed by the Department:

“(1) For each program participant, that individual’s age, sex, and length of treatment. This information shall be reported to the Department in a manner that does not disclose personally identifying information about program participants.

“(2) The total number of program participants who successfully transitioned to opioid abstinence for a minimum of 30 days, 60 days, 90 days, six months, 12 months, and 18 months.

“(3) The amount of State appropriations expended on a per program participant basis at each participating FQHC..

“(g) Evaluation of Pilot Program. — By November 1, 2020, the Department shall conduct and submit to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services a comprehensive evaluation of the effectiveness of this pilot program in addressing North Carolina’s growing opioid addiction and overdose crisis. The Department may contract with an institution of higher education or other qualified entity with expertise in evaluating programs similar to the pilot program authorized by this section. The comprehensive evaluation shall include whether this pilot program was successful as measured by at least all of the following:

“(1) The total number of program participants who successfully transitioned to opioid abstinence for a minimum of 30 days, 60 days, 90 days, six months, 12 months, and 18 months.

“(2) A cost-benefit analysis of the pilot program.

“(h) Expiration. — The pilot program conducted at each selected FQHC shall expire no later than three years after the date of its commencement at that particular FQHC.’

“(i) Funds in the amount of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) from the federal Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment Block Grant shall be allocated to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, for the 2016-2017 fiscal year. These funds shall be allocated to the FQHCs selected to participate in the pilot program authorized by this section on a per program participant basis to offset the cost of the following services:

“(1) Medication dispensed to program participants.

“(2) Provider fees for services rendered to program participants.

“(3) Up to 14 days of detoxification services.

“(4) Behavioral therapy for program participants.

“(5) Drug testing and monitoring of program participants.

“(j) Subsection (i) of this section becomes effective July 1, 2016. The remainder of this section is effective when it becomes law.”

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 12F.10, as amended by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11F.6(a), (b), provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that behavioral health services within the State are fragmented and a statewide comprehensive plan is necessary to ensure that individuals with behavioral health needs are timely served in the most appropriate settings and with the most appropriate services in order to achieve the best possible outcomes. The General Assembly further finds the absence of a statewide strategic plan that defines, coordinates, and facilitates the allocation of resources for needed services is an obstacle to improving the desired outcomes for behavioral health services in this State. It is the intention of the General Assembly to improve the delivery and coordination of behavioral health services across the State by targeting State resources to identified needs of covered populations and to treatments and services most effective at producing positive, measurable outcomes.

“(b) By January 1, 2018, the Department of Health and Human Services shall develop and submit to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, and the Fiscal Research Division a strategic statewide plan to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of State-funded behavioral health services. In developing the plan, the Department shall review and consider its past and current studies, and associated reports, relating to behavioral health services in the State. The plan shall include at least all of the following:

“(1) Identification of the Division that will (i) assume lead responsibility for the organization and delivery of publicly funded behavioral health services and (ii) define the current and future roles and responsibilities of local management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs) with respect to the organization and delivery of publicly funded behavioral health services.

“(2) A process for ensuring that all State contracts with behavioral health providers and managed care organizations responsible for managing Medicaid behavioral health services (including LME/MCOs) contain goals for overall behavioral health services, along with specific measurable outcomes for all publicly funded mental health, developmental disabilities, substance abuse, and traumatic brain injury services.

“(3) A statewide needs assessment for mental health, developmental disabilities, substance abuse, and traumatic brain injury services by county and type of service, broken down by the source of funding. The needs assessment must include a defined service continuum to address identified needs for targeted populations.

“(4) Specific solvency standards to be incorporated into State contracts with LME/MCOs that define appropriate cash balances, predictors for sustainability, and measures for performance that the LME/MCOs will monitor and report to the Department on a monthly, quarterly, and annual basis.

“(5) Any other component, study, or report that the Department deems necessary to achieve the goal of improving the effective and efficient delivery and coordination of publicly funded behavioral health services across the State.

“(b1) In the development of the strategic statewide plan, required under subsection (b) of this section, the Department of Health and Human Services shall consider policy issues pertaining to the delivery of services for people with intellectual and developmental disabilities. Consideration shall be given to all of the following:

“(1) The causes and potential solutions for the growing waitlist for NC Innovations Waiver slots. Potential solutions to be studied include the following:

“a. Increasing the funding for the 1915(c) Innovations Waiver to result in more individuals served.

“b. Creating new support waiver slots as recommended in the March 2015 “Study Additional 1915(c) Waiver” report from the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services.

“c. Utilizing a 1915(i) waiver option and exploring how the 1115 waiver required for Medicaid transformation may assist in addressing current waitlist for services.

“(2) Issues surrounding single-stream funding and how single-stream funding is used to support services for people with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

“(3) Multiple federal mandates that will directly impact current services and supports for people with intellectual and developmental disabilities, including Home and Community-Based Services changes, the Work Force Innovations and Opportunities Act, and changes under section 14(c) of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act.

“(4) The coverage of services for the treatment of autism, including any State Plan amendment needed to address guidance issued by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.”

“(c) The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice shall each establish a subcommittee on Behavioral Health Services. The subcommittees shall meet jointly to do the following:

“(1) Oversee the Department’s development of the strategic plan required by subsection (b) of this section.

“(2) Review the strategic plan developed by the Department in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, including a review of all performance-related goals and measures for the delivery of mental health, developmental disabilities, substance abuse, and traumatic brain injury services.

“(3) Review consolidated monthly, quarterly, and annual reports and analyses of behavioral health services funded by Medicaid and State-only appropriations.

“The subcommittees shall jointly make recommendations about the areas of oversight and review described in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this subsection and report their findings and recommendations to their respective committees. In conducting the required oversight and review, the subcommittees may seek input from other states, stakeholders, and national experts as they deem necessary in conducting their examination and developing their recommendations.”

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 11F.7, provides: